Mississippi, session 2026, HB1538.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The Mississippi Department of Transportation (MDOT) shall identify the completion of the United States Highway 25 four-lane bypass in Monroe County, Mississippi, as a priority transportation project due to its significance for traffic safety, freight mobility, and economic development. SECTION 2. The MDOT shall conduct or update all necessary planning, engineering, and feasibility assessments related to the completion of the bypass, including projected costs, right-of-way needs, and construction phasing. SECTION 3. The MDOT shall evaluate available state and federal funding sources, including discretionary federal transportation grants, and develop a proposed funding strategy to advance completion of the project. SECTION 4. The MDOT shall submit a written report detailing the status of the project, anticipated timelines, estimated costs, and recommended funding options to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Transportation Committees no later than December 1, 2026. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.